Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
ARTICLE 69
FAMILY ADVOCACY MENTAL HEALTH
JUVENILE JUSTICE PROGRAMS

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2010 containing provisions of article 22 of title 26. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

27-69-101 to 27-69-106. (Repealed)